District of Columbia statutes.
21-321

Applicability.

The District of Columbia Uniform Transfers to Minors Act applies to a transfer within the scope of section 21-302 made after the act’s effective date if the following occurs:

(1)

The transfer purports to have been made under District of Columbia Uniform Gifts to Minors Act; or

(2)

The instruments by which the transfer purports to have been made uses in substance the designation “as custodian under the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act” or “custodian under the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act” of any other state, and the application of the District of Columbia Uniform Transfers to Minors Act is necessary to validate the transfer.

Mar. 12, 1986, D.C. Law 6-87, § 2(a), 33 DCR 278
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 14(h), 45 DCR 745
1981 Ed., § 21-321.
“The act’s effective date,” referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a) of this section, is the effective date of D.C. Law 6-87, March 12, 1986.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 21 of the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.